Hawaii statutes.
PART III.
STATE ETHICS COMMISSION

§84-21 State ethics commission established;
composition. (a) There is established within the office of the auditor
for administrative purposes only a commission to be known as the state ethics
commission. The commission shall consist of five members appointed by the
governor from a panel of ten persons nominated by the judicial council. Each
member of the commission shall be a citizen of the United States and a resident
of the State. Members of the commission shall hold no other public office.

(b) The chairperson of the commission shall be
elected by the majority of the members of the commission. The term of each
member of the commission shall be for four years. No person shall be appointed
consecutively to more than two terms as a member of the commission. A vacancy
on the commission shall be filled for the remainder of the unexpired term in
the same manner as the original appointment, except that the judicial council
shall nominate for gubernatorial appointment two persons for a vacancy.

(c) No member of the commission shall hold
office for more than one hundred and twenty days after the expiration of the
member's term. If the governor fails to appoint a person to a vacant office
within sixty days after receipt of the list of nominees from the judicial
council, council shall select a person from its list of nominees to fill the
vacant office, notwithstanding subsection (b) and section 26-34 to the
contrary.

(d) The governor may remove or suspend any
member of the commission upon the filing of a written finding with the
commission, and upon service of a copy of the written finding on the member to
be removed or suspended. [L 1972, c 163, pt of §1; gen ch 1993; am L 1995, c
228, §1]

Attorney General Opinions

Member whose term has expired is entitled to hold over as a
de facto officer until successor is appointed. Att. Gen. Op. 70-1.

For a commissioner to be reappointed to second term, judicial
council must submit the commissioner's name along with another. Att. Gen. Op.
70-1.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next